North Dakota statutes. TITLE 11 Counties
CHAPTER 11-01 Names and Boundaries of Counties
11-01-26.
McHenry County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-one north, range eighty west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty and one hundred fifty-one north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-one north, range seventy-five west; thence north along the line between ranges seventy-four and seventy-five west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-two north, range seventy-five west, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence west along the thirteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range seventy-five west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges seventy-four and seventy-five west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range seventy-five west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fourteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range seventy-five west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges seventy-four and seventy-five west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range seventy-five west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range seventy-six west; thence north along the line between ranges seventy-five and seventy-six west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range seventy-six west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty-nine and one hundred sixty north to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range eighty west; thence south along the line between ranges eighty and eighty-one west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range eighty west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fourteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range eighty west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges eighty and eighty-one west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range eighty west, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence east along the thirteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-two north, range eighty west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges eighty and eighty-one west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 180; 1891, ch. 50, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 11-0126. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-27.
McIntosh County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred twenty-nine north, range seventy-three west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the seventh standard parallel; thence east along the seventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred twenty-nine north, range sixty-seven west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-six and sixty-seven west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range sixty-seven west, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence west along the eighth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range seventy-three west; thence south along the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 26, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0127. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-28.
McKenzie County.

Beginning at the point where the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana intersects the eleventh standard parallel; thence east along the eleventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range ninety-eight west of the fifth principal meridian; thence north along the line between ranges ninety-seven and ninety-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range ninety-eight west, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence east along the twelfth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-nine north, range ninety-four west; thence north along the line between ranges ninety-three and ninety-four west to the main channel of the Missouri River; thence in a northwesterly direction along the main channel of the Missouri River to a point where the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana intersects the main channel of the Missouri River; thence south along the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 73, §§ 1 to 8; R.C. 1905, §§ 2370 to 2376; C.L. 1913, §§ 3245 to 3249; R.C. 1943, § 11-0128. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-29.
McLean County.

Beginning at the point where the line between ranges ninety-one and ninety-two west of the fifth principal meridian intersects the main channel of the Missouri River; thence in a general southeasterly direction along the main channel of the Missouri River to the line between townships one hundred forty-two and one hundred forty-three north; thence east along the line between townships one hundred forty-two and one hundred forty-three north to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-three north, range eighty west; thence north along the line between ranges seventy-nine and eighty west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range eighty west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence east along the eleventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range seventy-nine west; thence north along the line between ranges seventy-eight and seventy-nine west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range seventy-nine west, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence east along the twelfth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-nine north, range seventy-eight west; thence north along the line between ranges seventy-seven and seventy-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty north, range seventy-eight west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty and one hundred fifty-one north to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty north, range ninety-one west; thence south along the line between ranges ninety-one and ninety-two west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 50, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 11-0129. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-30.
Mercer County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range ninety west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence east along the tenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range eighty-eight west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-three north, range eighty-eight west; thence east along the line between townships one hundred forty-three and one hundred forty-four north to the line between ranges eighty-three and eighty-four west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty-three and eighty-four west to the main channel of the Missouri River; thence in a general northwesterly direction along the main channel of the Missouri River to a point where the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west intersects the main channel of the Missouri River; thence south along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range ninety west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence east along the eleventh standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range ninety west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1903, ch. 68; R.C. 1943, § 11-0130. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-31.
Morton County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-eight north, range ninety west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred thirty-seven and one hundred thirty-eight north to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range eighty-seven west; thence south along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range eighty-seven west, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence east along the ninth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range eighty-four west; thence south along the line between ranges eighty-four and eighty-five west to the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-four north, range eighty-four west; thence east along the line between townships one hundred thirty-three and one hundred thirty-four north to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range eighty-two west; thence south along the line between ranges eighty-two and eighty-three west to the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range eighty-two west, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence east along the eighth standard parallel to the point where the eighth standard parallel intersects the main channel of the Cannonball River; thence in a northeasterly direction along the main channel of the Cannonball River to the main channel of the Missouri River; thence in a northerly direction along the main channel of the Missouri River to the intersection of the tenth standard parallel with the main channel of the Missouri River; thence west along the tenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty north, range ninety west; thence south along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1891, ch. 50, § 9; 1897, ch. 79, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, § 11-0131. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-32.
Mountrail County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-one north, range ninety-one west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty and one hundred fifty-one north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-one north, range eighty-eight west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-two north, range eighty-eight west, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence west along the thirteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range eighty-eight west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range eighty-eight west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fourteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range eighty-eight west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range eighty-eight west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range ninety-four west; thence south along the line between ranges ninety-four and ninety-five west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range ninety-four west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fourteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range ninety-four west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges ninety-four and ninety-five west to the main channel of the Missouri River; thence in a southeasterly direction along the main channel of the Missouri River to the point where the line between ranges ninety-one and ninety-two west intersects the main channel of the Missouri River; thence north along the line between ranges ninety-one and ninety-two west to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0132. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-33.
Nelson County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-nine north, range sixty-one west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence east along the twelfth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-nine north, range fifty-seven west; thence north along the line between ranges fifty-six and fifty-seven west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-two north, range fifty-seven west, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence west along the thirteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range fifty-seven west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges fifty-six and fifty-seven west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-four north, range fifty-seven west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty-four and one hundred fifty-five north to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-four north, range sixty west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty and sixty-one west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range sixty west, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence west along the thirteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-two north, range sixty-one west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 28, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0133. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-34.
Oliver County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range eighty-seven west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence east along the tenth standard parallel to the main channel of the Missouri River; thence in a northwesterly direction along the main channel of the Missouri River to the point where the line between ranges eighty-three and eighty-four west intersects the main channel of the Missouri River; thence south along the line between ranges eighty-three and eighty-four west to the line between townships one hundred forty-three and one hundred forty-four north; thence west along the line between townships one hundred forty-three and one hundred forty-four north to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-three north, range eighty-seven west; thence south along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1885, ch. 31, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 11-0134. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-35.
Pembina County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range fifty-six west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north to the main channel of the Red River of the North; thence in a northerly direction along the main channel of the Red River of the North to the point where such channel intersects the international boundary line between North Dakota and Canada; thence west along the international boundary line to the line between ranges fifty-six and fifty-seven west; thence south along the line between ranges fifty-six and fifty-seven west to the southwest corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range fifty-six west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fifteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred sixty north, range fifty-six west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges fifty-six and fifty-seven west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1873, ch. 20, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0135. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-36.
Pierce County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-one north, range seventy-four west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty and one hundred fifty-one north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-one north, range seventy-two west; thence north along the line between ranges seventy-one and seventy-two west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-two north, range seventy-two west, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence west along the thirteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range seventy-two west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges seventy-one and seventy-two west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range seventy-two west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fourteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range sixty-nine west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-eight and sixty-nine west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range sixty-nine west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range seventy-four west; thence south along the line between ranges seventy-four and seventy-five west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range seventy-four west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fourteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range seventy-four west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges seventy-four and seventy-five to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range seventy-four west, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence east along the thirteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-two north, range seventy-four west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges seventy-four and seventy-five west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 180, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0136. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-37.
Ramsey County.

Beginning at the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range sixty-one west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence north along the line between ranges sixty and sixty-one west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-four north, range sixty-one west; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-four and one hundred fifty-five north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-five north, range sixty west; thence north along the line between ranges fifty-nine and sixty west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range sixty west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fourteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range sixty west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges fifty-nine and sixty west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range sixty west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range sixty-four west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-four and sixty-five west to the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-seven north, range sixty-four west, a point on the fourteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fourteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-six north, range sixty-six west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-six and sixty-seven west to a point where said line intersects the center of Mauvaise Coulee; thence southeasterly along the center of said Mauvaise Coulee to the intersection with the meander line of Devils Lake at the mouth of the Mauvaise Coulee; thence along the west meander line of Devils Lake, said line being generally in a southerly and easterly direction, to the line between townships one hundred fifty-three and one hundred fifty-four north; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-three and one hundred fifty-four north to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty-three north, range sixty-five west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-five and sixty-six west to a point where said line intersects the thirteenth standard parallel; thence east on the thirteenth standard parallel to a point where the said thirteenth standard parallel intersects the meander line of Devils Lake as re-established by the United States department of the interior in surveys accepted in 1972; thence easterly along said meander line to the point on the southern extremity of East Devils Lake; thence northerly along the east meander line of said East Devils Lake to a point where said meander line intersects the south line of lot one, section eight, township one hundred fifty-one north, range sixty-two west; thence east along the quarter quarter line to the intersection of said line with the east boundary of the Devils Lake Indian Reservation; thence southeasterly to where said east boundary line intersects the south line of lot one, section ten, township one hundred fifty-one north, range sixty-two west; thence east along the quarter quarter line to the range line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west, being a point one thousand three hundred twenty feet, more or less, south of the northeast corner of section twelve, township one hundred fifty-one north, range sixty-two west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-two north, range sixty-two west, a point on the thirteenth standard parallel; thence east along the thirteenth standard parallel to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1899, ch. 58, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0137; S.L. 1983, ch. 146, § 2. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-38.
Ransom County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range fifty-eight west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence east along the eighth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range fifty-three west; thence north along the line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range fifty-three west, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence west along the ninth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range fifty-eight west; thence south along the line between ranges fifty-eight and fifty-nine west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1873, ch. 20, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 11-0138. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-39.
Renville County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range eighty-six west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-seven and one hundred fifty-eight north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range eighty-one west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty and eighty-one west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty-eight north, range eighty-one west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range eighty-four west; thence north along the line between ranges eighty-three and eighty-four west to the northeast corner of township one hundred sixty north, range eighty-four west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fifteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range eighty-four west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges eighty-three and eighty-four west, to the international boundary line between Canada and the United States; thence west along the international boundary line to the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west; thence south along the line between ranges eighty-seven and eighty-eight west to the southwest corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range eighty-seven west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fifteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred sixty north, range eighty-six west; thence south along the line between ranges eighty-six and eighty-seven west to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0139. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-40.
Richland County.

Beginning at the point where the line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three west of the fifth principal meridian intersects the seventh standard parallel; thence east along the seventh standard parallel to the main channel of the Bois de Sioux River; thence in a northerly direction along the main channel of the Bois de Sioux River to the Red River of the North; thence in a northerly direction along the main channel of the Red River of the North to the intersection of the main channel of the Red River of the North and the ninth standard parallel; thence west along the ninth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range fifty-two west; thence south along the line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three west to the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range fifty-two west, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence east along the eighth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range fifty-two west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three west to the northern boundary of the original Sisseton and Wahpeton Indian Reservation, now known as Lake Traverse Lands; thence southeasterly along said north boundary to the line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three west; thence south along the line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1873, ch. 20, § 4; 1885, ch. 34, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0140. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-41.
Rolette County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range seventy-three west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred fifty-eight and one hundred fifty-nine north to the southeast corner of township one hundred fifty-nine north, range sixty-nine west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-eight and sixty-nine west to the northeast corner of township one hundred sixty north, range sixty-nine west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence west along the fifteenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range sixty-nine west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges sixty-eight and sixty-nine west to the international boundary line between the United States and Canada; thence west along the international boundary line to the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west; thence south along the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west to the southwest corner of township one hundred sixty-one north, range seventy-three west, a point on the fifteenth standard parallel; thence east along the fifteenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred sixty north, range seventy-three west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 37, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 11-0141. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-42.
Sargent County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred twenty-nine north, range fifty-eight west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the seventh standard parallel; thence east along the seventh standard parallel to the line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three west; thence north along the line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three west to the north boundary line of the original Sisseton and Wahpeton Indian Reservation, now known as Lake Traverse Lands; thence northwesterly along the said boundary line to the line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range fifty-three west, a point on the eighth standard parallel; thence west along the eighth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-two north, range fifty-eight west; thence south along the line between ranges fifty-eight and fifty-nine west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 32, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0142. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-43.
Sheridan County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range seventy-eight west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence east along the eleventh standard parallel to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range seventy-four west; thence north along the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range seventy-four west, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence west along the twelfth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-nine north, range seventy-four west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges seventy-three and seventy-four west to the northeast corner of township one hundred fifty north, range seventy-four west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred fifty and one hundred fifty-one north to the northwest corner of township one hundred fifty north, range seventy-seven west; thence south along the line between ranges seventy-seven and seventy-eight west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-nine north, range seventy-seven west, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence west along the twelfth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range seventy-eight west; thence south along the line between ranges seventy-eight and seventy-nine west to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0143. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-44.
Sioux County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred twenty-nine north, range ninety west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the seventh standard parallel; thence east along the seventh standard parallel to the main channel of the Missouri River; thence in a northerly direction along the main channel of the Missouri River to the point where the main channel of the Cannonball River intersects the main channel of the Missouri River; thence in a southwesterly direction along the main channel of the Cannonball River and the South Fork of the Cannonball River to the point where the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west intersects the main channel of the South Fork of the Cannonball River; thence south along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0144. Governor’s proclamation filed in the office of the secretary of state. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-45.
Slope County.

Beginning at the point where the boundary line between the states of Montana and North Dakota intersects the eighth standard parallel; thence east along the eighth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-three north, range ninety-eight west on the fifth principal meridian; thence north along the line between ranges ninety-seven and ninety-eight west to the northeast corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range ninety-eight west, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence west along the ninth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-six north, range one hundred four west; thence south along the line between ranges one hundred four and one hundred five west to the northwest corner of township one hundred thirty-five north, range one hundred four west; thence west along the line between townships one hundred thirty-five and one hundred thirty-six north to the intersection of said line with the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana; thence south along the boundary line between the states of North Dakota and Montana to the point of beginning.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 11-0145. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-46.
Stark County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range ninety-nine west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence east along the ninth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range ninety-one west; thence north along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty north, range ninety-one west, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence west along the tenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range ninety-one west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges ninety and ninety-one west to the northeast corner of section twenty-five, township one hundred forty-one north, range ninety-one west; thence west along a line parallel to and two miles [3.2 kilometers] distant in a northerly direction from the tenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of section thirty, township one hundred forty-one north, range ninety-three west; thence south along the line between ranges ninety-three and ninety-four west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range ninety-three west, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence west along the tenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty north, range ninety-nine west; thence south along the line between ranges ninety-nine and one hundred west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 179, § 2; 1891, ch. 50, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 11-0146. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-47.
Steele County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range fifty-seven west of the fifth principal meridian; thence east along the line between townships one hundred forty-three and one hundred forty-four north to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range fifty-four west; thence north along the line between ranges fifty-three and fifty-four west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range fifty-four west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence west along the eleventh standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range fifty-four west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges fifty-three and fifty-four west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range fifty-four west, a point on the twelfth standard parallel; thence west along the twelfth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-eight north, range fifty-seven west; thence south along the line between ranges fifty-seven and fifty-eight west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-five north, range fifty-seven west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence east along the eleventh standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range fifty-seven west; thence continuing south on the line between ranges fifty-seven and fifty-eight west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1883, ch. 36, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-0147. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.

11-01-48.
Stutsman County.

Beginning at the southwest corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range sixty-nine west of the fifth principal meridian, a point on the ninth standard parallel; thence east along the ninth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred thirty-seven north, range sixty-two west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west; thence north along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty north, range sixty-two west, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence west along the tenth standard parallel to the southeast corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range sixty-two west; thence continuing north along the line between ranges sixty-one and sixty-two west to the northeast corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range sixty-two west, a point on the eleventh standard parallel; thence west along the eleventh standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty-four north, range sixty-nine west; thence south along the line between ranges sixty-nine and seventy west to the southwest corner of township one hundred forty-one north, range sixty-nine west, a point on the tenth standard parallel; thence east along the tenth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township one hundred forty north, range sixty-nine west; thence continuing south along the line between ranges sixty-nine and seventy west to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 1873, ch. 20, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 11-0148. General highways and transportation maps prepared by the North Dakota state highway department.